Maryland, session 2025, HB0107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(XLVI) SECTION 14–1328 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1328.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUTOMATIC RENEWAL” MEANS ANY CONTRACT,
PLAN, OR AGREEMENT BETWEEN A CONSUMER AND A SELLER IN WHICH A PAID
SUBSCRIPTION OR PURCHASING AGREEMENT IS AUTOMATICALLY RENEWED AT THE
END OF A DEFINITE TERM OF MORE THAN 1 MONTH FOR A SUBSEQUENT TERM.

HOUSE BILL 107 3
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT MAKE AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER TO A CONSUMER UNLESS
THE PERSON:
(I) PRESENTS THE CONSUMER WITH THE TERMS OF THE
AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER IN A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS MANNER BEFORE THE
SUBSCRIPTION OR PURCHASING AGREEMENT IS FULFILLED AND IN VISUAL
PROXIMITY TO, OR IN THE CASE OF AN OFFER CONVEYED ORALLY, AT THE SAME
TIME AS, THE REQUEST FOR CONSENT TO THE OFFER, INCLUDING:
1. THE PRICE THAT WILL BE CHARGED AFTER THE
INITIAL TERM ENDS; OR
2. THE MANNER IN WHICH THE SUBSCRIPTION OR
PURCHASING AGREEMENT WILL CHANGE AT THE END OF THE INITIAL TERM;
(II) PRESENTS THE CONSUMER WITH AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE
DISCLOSURE OF THE METHODS THAT THE CONSUMER MAY USE TO CANCEL THE
AUTOMATIC RENEWAL; AND
(III) ALLOWS THE CONSUMER TO TERMINATE THE OFFER IN A
MANNER THAT DOES NOT UNREASONABLY DELAY, HINDER, OR OBSTRUCT THE
CONSUMER’S ABILITY TO TERMINATE THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL.
(2) IF THE OFFER ALSO INCLUDES A FREE GIFT OR TRIAL, THE OFFER
SHALL INCLUDE A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS EXPLANATION OF THE PRICE THAT
WILL BE CHARGED AFTER THE TRIAL ENDS AND THE MANNER IN WHICH THE
SUBSCRIPTION OR PURCHASING AGREEMENT PRICING WILL CHANGE AT THE END
OF THE TRIAL.
(3) (I) A PERSON THAT MAKES AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER
SHALL ALLOW A CONSUMER WHO ACCEPTS THE OFFER TO TERMINATE THE
AUTOMATIC RENEWAL BY PROVIDING THE CONSUMER A SIMPLE, COST–EFFECTIVE,
AND WIDELY AVAILABLE COST–EFFECTIVE, TIMELY, AND EASY–TO–USE MECHANISM
TO:
1. CANCEL THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL;
2. AVOID BEING CHARGED OR AVOID BEING CHARGED
AN INCREASED AMOUNT; AND
3. IMMEDIATELY STOP ANY RECURRING CHARGES.

HOUSE BILL 107
(II) A MECHANISM UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MUST:
1. BE AT LEAST AS EASY TO USE AS THE MECHANISM THE
CONSUMER USED TO CONSENT TO THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL;
2. BE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SAME MEDIUM THE
CONSUMER USED TO CONSENT TO THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL;
3. IN THE CASE OF CANCELLATION BY ELECTRONIC
MEDIUM, BE EASY TO FIND AND, NOT REQUIRE INTERACTION WITH A LIVE OR
VIRTUAL REPRESENTATIVE UNLESS THE CONSUMER INTERACTED WITH A LIVE OR
VIRTUAL REPRESENTATIVE TO CONSENT TO THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL, INCLUDING
AND INCLUDE:
A. A PROMINENTLY LOCATED PLACED DIRECT LINK OR
BUTTON TO INITIATE THE CANCELLATION PROCESS, WHICH MAY BE LOCATED
EITHER WITHIN A CUSTOMER ACCOUNT OR PROFILE OR WITHIN DEVICE OR USER
SETTINGS; OR
B. BY AN AN IMMEDIATELY ACCESSIBLE TERMINATION
E–MAIL FORMATTED AND PROVIDED BY THE BUSINESS OR PERSON THAT MADE THE
AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER THAT A CONSUMER MAY SEND WITHOUT ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION;
4. IN THE CASE OF CANCELLATION BY TELEPHONE
CALL, BE PROMPTLY PERFORMED THROUGH CALLS RECEIVED AT A TOLL–FREE
TELEPHONE NUMBER THAT IS ANSWERED OR RECORDS MESSAGES AND THAT IS
MADE AVAILABLE DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS; AND
5. IN THE CASE OF CANCELLATION PERFORMED IN
PERSON, BE PERFORMED IN A MANNER SIMILAR TO THE IN–PERSON METHOD THE
CONSUMER USED TO CONSENT TO THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
MAIL TO A POSTAL ADDRESS, IF THE PERSON BILLS THE CONSUMER AT THE
CONSUMER’S POSTAL ADDRESS.
(III) THE ALTERNATIVE MECHANISMS DESCRIBED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (II)3 AND 4 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MUST ALSO BE MADE AVAILABLE
FOR AN IN–PERSON CANCELLATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)5 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(IV) 1. IF A CONSUMER HAS AN ACCOUNT WITH A BUSINESS,
THE BUSINESS MAY REQUIRE THE CONSUMER TO ENTER ACCOUNT INFORMATION OR

HOUSE BILL 107 5
OTHERWISE AUTHENTICATE THE ACCOUNT ONLINE BEFORE ONLINE TERMINATION
OF THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OR CONTINUOUS SERVICE.
2. IF A CONSUMER IS UNWILLING OR UNABLE TO ENTER
ACCOUNT INFORMATION OR OTHERWISE AUTHENTICATE THE CONSUMER’S
ACCOUNT ONLINE BEFORE ONLINE TERMINATION OF THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OR
CONTINUOUS SERVICE, THE CONSUMER MAY NOT BE PRECLUDED FROM
AUTHENTICATING THE CONSUMER’S ACCOUNT OR TERMINATING THE AUTOMATIC
RENEWAL OR CONTINUOUS SERVICE USING ANOTHER METHOD THAT THE BUSINESS
PROVIDES IN A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS MANNER.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A
PERSON THAT MAKES AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER OR AN OFFER THAT
INCLUDES A FREE GIFT OR TRIAL LASTING MORE THAN 14 DAYS SHALL, BEFORE THE
END OF THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OR FREE TRIAL, PROVIDE CLEAR AND
CONSPICUOUS NOTICE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THAT THE OFFER WILL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW UNLESS
THE CONSUMER CANCELS;
(II) THE DURATION AND ANY ADDITIONAL TERMS OF THE
RENEWAL PERIOD, INCLUDING:
1. THE PRICE THAT WILL BE CHARGED AFTER THE
RENEWAL OR THE FREE TRIAL ENDS; OR
2. THE MANNER IN WHICH THE SUBSCRIPTION OR
PURCHASING AGREEMENT WILL CHANGE AT THE END OF THE TRIAL;
(III) THE VARIOUS METHODS BY WHICH A CONSUMER MAY
CANCEL THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OR CONTINUOUS SERVICE;
(IV) IF THE NOTICE IS SENT ELECTRONICALLY, A LINK THAT
DIRECTS THE CONSUMER TO THE CANCELLATION PROCESS OR ANOTHER
REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE ELECTRONIC METHOD THAT DIRECTS THE CONSUMER TO
THE CANCELLATION PROCESS IF NO LINK EXISTS; AND
(V) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE BUSINESS OR PERSON
THAT MADE THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER.
(2) IF AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER INCLUDES A FREE GIFT OR
TRIAL LASTING MORE THAN 14 DAYS, THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED NOT LESS THAN 3 DAYS AND NOT

HOUSE BILL 107
MORE THAN 21 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE WHEN THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL IS
SCHEDULED TO TAKE EFFECT.
(3) IF THE CONSUMER HAS ACCEPTED AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL
OFFER WITH AN INITIAL TERM OF AT LEAST 1 YEAR, THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED NOT LESS THAN 15 DAYS
AND NOT MORE THAN 45 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE WHEN THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL
IS SCHEDULED TO TAKE EFFECT.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON
THAT MAKES AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OFFER WITH AN INITIAL DEFINITE TERM OF
MORE THAN 1 MONTH MAY NOT AUTOMATICALLY CHARGE THE CONSUMER’S CREDIT
CARD UNLESS:
(1) CLEAR CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS NOTICE IS PROVIDED TO THE
CONSUMER; AND
(2) THE CONSUMER PROVIDES CONSENT TO THE AUTOMATIC
CHARGE OF THE CONSUMER’S CREDIT CARD.
(E) A PERSON THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR CONTRACT
RENEWAL PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE OR FEDERAL REGULATORY
AGENCY THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR REGULATING THE PERSON OR THAT IS
LICENSED UNDER TITLE 18 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) ANY ANY BUSINESS OR PERSON OR ANY AFFILIATE OF A BUSINESS
OR PERSON WITH CONTRACT RENEWAL PRACTICES SUBJECT TO REGULATIONS,
RULES, PROCEDURES, OR GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE MARYLAND
INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION; OR
(2) ANY ENTITY OR ANY AFFILIATE OF AN ENTITY REGULATED UNDER
THE MARYLAND SERVICE CONTRACTS AND CONSUMER PRODUCTS GUARANTY ACT;
OR
(2) (3) A SERVICE REGULATED BY:
(I) THE MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;
(II) THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION; OR

HOUSE BILL 107 7
(III) THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION.
(G) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT § 13–408 §§ 13–408 AND 13–411
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(H) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE A
PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION OR ANY OTHER LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.